Tennessee, session 114, SB2617.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1.
The district attorneys general conference shall collect and analyze data on the
number of prosecutions, and the number of convictions, made pursuant to Tennessee
Code Annotated, Section 47-18-1509. To prepare the report, the district attorneys
general conference may consult with the Tennessee bureau of investigation, the
department of safety, the department of correction, and other law enforcement agencies,
to the extent those agencies may provide information in compliance with state and
federal law. On or before December 15, 2026, the district attorneys general conference
shall submit a report on such prosecutions and convictions to the governor, the speakers
of the senate and the house of representatives, and the legislative librarian.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2617
012052
- 1 -